District of Columbia statutes.
28-3151

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “merchant” means a person who does or would sell, lease, or transfer, either directly or indirectly, consumer goods or services, or a person who does or would supply the goods or services which are or would be the subject matter of a trade practice.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-93, § 2, 53 DCR 1645
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 301, 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 added this section to Title 28, an enacted title of the District of Columbia Official Code.